StemAllomorphy.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Sing +Dual +Plur +Nom +Acc +Ins +Dat +Abl +Gen +Loc

Definitions
  Number = %+Sing|%+Dual|%+Plur;
  Direct = %+Nom|%+Acc;
  Oblique = %+Ins|%+Dat|%+Abl|%+Gen|%+Loc;

LEXICON Root
ant:at  Weak;
ivans:ivāṃs Strong;
ivans:ivat  Middle;
ivans:uṣ   Weakest;
in:i    Middle;

LEXICON Strong
<Number Direct - %+Plur %+Acc> #;

LEXICON Weak
<Number Oblique | %+Plur %+Acc> #;

LEXICON Middle
<[%+Dual | %+Plur] [%+Ins | %+Dat | %+Abl] | %+Plur %+Loc> #;

LEXICON Weakest
<%+Sing Oblique | %+Dual [%+Gen | %+Loc] | %+Plur [%+Acc | %+Gen]> #;
